District of Columbia statutes.
24-711

Patient not deemed a criminal.

The patient in any proceedings under §§ 24-701 to 24-711 shall not be deemed a criminal and the commitment of any such patient shall not be deemed a conviction.

History

June 24, 1953, 67 Stat. 79, ch. 149, § 12
July 24, 1956, 70 Stat. 612, ch. 676, title I, § 101

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-611.
1973 Ed., § 24-611.